Utah statutes.
7-8-15.   Bad debts.

(1)  All demand and matured debts due to any industrial bank on which interest is past due and has not been paid for a period of six months, unless they are well secured and in the process of collection, are considered bad debts and shall be charged off to the profit and loss account.

(2)  The industrial bank shall maintain in its files documentation to support its evaluation of the security and monthly reports of its collection efforts and a plan of collection.

